Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-963
Purpose of Autism Treatment Program Act.

The purpose of the Autism Treatment Program Act is to provide for the development and administration of a waiver or an amendment to an existing waiver under the medical assistance program established in section 68-903.

Laws 2007, LB482, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1,139;

Laws 2009, LB27, § 3.
May 27, 2009